Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,122
University of Nebraska at Kearney; provisions applicable.

The provisions of Chapter 85 relating to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall be applicable to the University of Nebraska at Kearney except as modified or limited.

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 10.

Since five judges of the court do not hold that this section is unconstitutional, the section is constitutional. State ex rel. Spire v. Beermann, 235 Neb. 384, 455 N.W.2d 749 (1990).